Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 26

Information Technology

Subchapter 2

— Information Technology Access for the Blind

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 914, § 35: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly that continuing advances in the field of communications and information technology make it necessary to establish a Department of Information Systems within the Executive Department of Government to better coordinate and utilize such technology; and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 1069, § 2: Apr. 16, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the inability to procure a network manager is harmful to multiple systems in current use throughout the state; and that this act is immediately necessary to avoid harm to the multiple systems throughout the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

25-27-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as and shall be known as the “Information Network of Arkansas Act”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1139, § 1.

25-27-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means any agency, board, commission, public instrumentality, political subdivision, or any of the foregoing entities acting on behalf of the State of Arkansas which store, gather, or generate public information;

“Gateway system” means any centralized electronic information system by which public information shall be disseminated or collected via the Internet, dial-in modem, continuous link, or other electronic medium;

“I.N.A.” means the Information Network of Arkansas, or, if the Information Network of Arkansas shall be abolished, the board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given by this chapter to the Information Network of Arkansas shall be given by law;

“Network manager” means the entity or person designated by contractual obligation to establish, develop, operate, maintain, and expand the gateway system on behalf of the Information Network of Arkansas;

“Public information” means any information stored, gathered, or generated in electronic or magnetic form by an agency, its agencies, or instrumentalities, which is included within the information deemed to be public pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and other provisions of the Arkansas Code providing for release of information to the public at large to specified groups or recipients; and

“User association” means an association:

Whose membership is identifiable by regular payment of association dues and regularly maintained membership lists;

Which is registered with the Secretary of State as an Arkansas corporation;

Which exists for the purpose of advancing the common occupation or profession of its membership; and

Which, after the appointment of the initial board of the Information Network of Arkansas, regularly promotes and encourages the subscription of its members to the gateway system developed by the Information Network of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1139, § 2; 1999, No. 538, § 1.

25-27-103. Board.

There is created the Information Network of Arkansas, a public instrumentality carrying out an essential government function, which shall be governed by a board consisting of twelve (12) voting members, as follows:

The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission or his or her designee;

The Secretary of State, or the Secretary of State's designee;

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his or her designee;

Two (2) members, or their designees, who are chief executive officers of agencies of the executive branch other than the Department of Finance and Administration and the Division of Information Systems, shall be appointed by the Governor;

(a)Four (4) members from user associations initially selected by the Governor shall be appointed by the Governor after consulting each user association.

Members appointed by the Governor under subdivision (a)(5)(A)(i)(a) of this section shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.

Six (6) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of six (6) members shall be necessary for any action taken by the board.

No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all the duties of the board.

The board shall meet at least semiannually.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be eligible to receive reimbursement for mileage and reimbursement for expenses in accordance with § 25-16-902.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted, subdivision (b)(1) began: “The Governor shall select the initial chairperson from the board membership. Thereafter … .”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 62, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority.

“(a)(1)The Arkansas Science and Technology Authority is transferred to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the commission is the principal department under Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, of the authority are transferred to the commission, except as specified in this act.

“(c)The prescribed powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing; promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards; and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudication of the authority are transferred to the executive director of the commission, except as specified in this act.

“(d)The members of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the board except as specified in this act.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 115 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 62.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 1100 substituted “after consulting” for “from a list of three (3) names submitted by” in (a)(5)(A)(i)(a) ; rewrote (a)(5)(A)(i)(b) ; redesignated former (a)(6)(A)(i) as (a)(6)(A); in (a)(6)(A), inserted “who is a public library director,” substituted “after consulting” for “from a list of three (3) names of public library directors submitted by,” and added “and subject to confirmation by the Senate”; deleted (a)(6)(A)(ii); and in (a)(7)(A), substituted “after consulting” for “from a list of three (3) names submitted by” and added “and subject to confirmation by the Senate.”

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Executive Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission or his or her designee” for “President of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, or the president’s designee” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment deleted “Executive” preceding “Director” in (a)(1); rewrote (a)(3); and substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a)(4) and (8).

To develop and implement an electronic gateway system to provide electronic access to members of the public to public information and to develop, implement, and promote the use of electronic commerce and digital signature applications within the state in cooperation with the Division of Information Systems;

To provide appropriate oversight of the network manager;

To establish charges for the services provided by the Information Network of Arkansas.

The Information Network of Arkansas shall on a quarterly basis submit a report of any change in charges for services to the:

Legislative Council; and

Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology;

To explore ways of expanding the amount and kind of public information provided, increasing the utility and form of the public information provided, and implement such changes as required to be consistent with the provisions of this chapter;

To explore ways of improving citizen and business access to public information and, where appropriate, implementing such changes;

To explore ways of expanding a gateway system and its services to citizens and businesses by providing add-on services to the public, such as access to other for-profit information databases, electronic mail, and calendaring;

To serve in an advisory capacity to the Department of Finance and Administration, the division, and other state agencies regarding the dissemination to and collection of state data for the citizens and businesses of Arkansas;

To seek advice from the general public, its subscribers, professional associations, academic groups, and institutions and individuals with knowledge or interest in computer networking, electronic mail, public information access, gateway services, add-on services, and electronic filing of information; and

To accept gifts, donations, and grants for the support of a gateway system in Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (a)(3)(B); and redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(3)(A).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a)(1) and (7); and substituted “division” for “Department of Information Systems” in (b)(4).

Cross References. Release of criminal history information, authorization of, §12-12-1507.

The contract shall specify the duties and responsibilities of the network manager and shall also include any other terms necessary to the agreement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(1), substituted “may” for “shall” and “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems”; and substituted “division” for “Department of Information Systems” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1069 substituted “shall procure a network manager” for “shall contract with a network manager and shall use a competitive bid process” in (a)(1).

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in §§25-28-101 —25-28-107 may not apply to §25-28-108 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 436, § 10: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the duties of the Assessment Coordination Division are of critical importance to the administration of the Arkansas ad valorem tax system, that these duties may be performed more efficiently within a separate Department which is responsible only for the administration of ad valorem taxes and that the provisions of this Act are of critical importance to preserve and improve the efficient administration of the tax laws of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 1377, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2005, No. 1417, § 2: Mar. 30, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Assessment Coordination Department needs to adopt and implement by rules final specifications for computer assisted mass appraisal software; that the rules need to be in place to protect counties conducting reappraisals; and that this act is immediately necessary because delaying implementation would cause irreparable delays in the proper assessments for property. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 26 and 27, § 4: Apr. 11, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Supreme Court declared the public school funding system to be inadequate and that the public schools are operating under a constitutional infirmity which must be corrected immediately; that to correct the constitutional infirmity and to ensure adequate funding for public education, the General Assembly must have more accurate and timely information regarding the assessment, settlement, and collection of property taxes by the counties; and that this act is necessary to allow the Assessment Coordination Department, the Department of Education, and the counties sufficient time to make all necessary rules, adjustments, calculations, and reports that will be necessary prior to the convening of the 86th General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “Assessment Coordination Department” in (a); in (b)(1), substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “department” and substituted “Director of the Assessment Coordination Division” for “Director of the Assessment Coordination Department”; added (b)(3); substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “department” twice in (c); inserted “in consultation with the secretary” in (d)(1); rewrote (d)(2); substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “department” in (d)(3) and (e)(1); and, in (e)(2), inserted the first occurrence of “Assessment Coordination Division” and substituted the second occurrence of “Assessment Coordination Division” for “department”.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning transfer, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3575, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 436, § 2.

The network manager shall:

The division may provide to the Information Network of Arkansas such staff and other assistance under contract.

There is created the Assessment Coordination Division.

(1)The executive head of the Assessment Coordination Division shall be the Director of the Assessment Coordination Division.

The Assessment Coordination Division shall consist of the divisions which may be necessary to fulfill its purposes and which may be created by law and placed under the Assessment Coordination Division.

(1)The director, in consultation with the secretary, shall appoint the heads of the respective divisions.

(1)Each division of the Assessment Coordination Division shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the director.

The Arkansas Public Service Commission shall retain all of its statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions regarding assessment and equalization of properties of public utilities and public carriers.

The Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service Commission shall retain all of the statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions conferred on the division by law or assigned to the division by the commission.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rates” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (c)-(e).

No two (2) members appointed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(5) shall be members of the same user association.

Such members shall serve staggered three-year terms;

(A)One (1) member who is a public library director appointed by the Governor after consulting the President of the Arkansas Library Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate.

The member shall serve a three-year term;

(A)One (1) member appointed by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Bar Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate.

The member shall serve a three-year term; and

The Director of the Division of Information Systems, or the director's designee.

(1)The board shall annually elect one (1) member from the board as chair of the board.

The board may also elect a vice chair and a secretary.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1139, § 3; 1997, No. 914, § 25; 1999, No. 538, § 2; 2015, No. 1100, § 62; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 115; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 115; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6310-6312.

25-27-104. Duties.

The Information Network of Arkansas shall have the following duties:

(1)All state agencies shall participate with the Information Network of Arkansas in providing assistance as may be requested for the achievement of its purpose.

Services and information to be provided by any agency shall be specified pursuant to a contract between the Information Network of Arkansas and such an agency.

Agencies may contract to recover from the Information Network of Arkansas costs incurred by providing such assistance to the Information Network of Arkansas.

The Information Network of Arkansas shall cooperate with the division to fulfill the purposes of the Arkansas Information Systems Act of 1997, §25-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1139, § 4; 1999, No. 538, § 3; 2015, No. 550, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6313-6315.

25-27-105. Network manager.

(1)The Information Network of Arkansas shall procure a network manager after developing, in consultation with the Division of Information Systems, criteria and specifications for such a network manager and his or her duties.

(A)The Information Network of Arkansas may negotiate and enter into a contract with the network manager.

Direct and supervise the day-to-day operations and expansion of the gateway system, including the initial phase of operations necessary to make the gateway system operational;

Attend meetings of the Information Network of Arkansas;

Keep a record of all gateway, network, and related operations of the Information Network of Arkansas. The records shall be the property of the Information Network of Arkansas;

Maintain and be a custodian of all financial and operational records, documents, and papers filed with the Information Network of Arkansas;

Update and revise on a yearly basis the business plan of the Information Network of Arkansas in consultation with and under the direction of the Information Network of Arkansas;

Submit to the Information Network of Arkansas quarterly financial reports, an annual audit, an annual report, and any other information requested by the Board of the Information Network of Arkansas; and

Perform other such activities or services as requested or authorized by the Information Network of Arkansas consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1139, § 5; 1999, No. 538, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6316, 6317; 2019, No. 1069, § 1.